Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 6. State Highway Patrol, Game and Fish Warden and Criminal InvestigatorRetirement

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

60A Am. Jur. 2d Pensions and Retirement Funds §§ 1166 to 1260.

Disciplinary suspension of public employee as affecting computation of length of service for retirement or pension purposes, 6 ALR2d 506.

Meaning of “salary,” “wages,” “pay” or the like within pension law basing benefits thereon, 14 ALR2d 634.

Rights and liabilities as between employer and employee with respect to general pension or retirement plan, 42 ALR2d 461, 46 ALR3d 464.

Vested right of pensioner to pension, 52 ALR2d 437.

Misconduct as affecting right to pension or retention in pension system, 76 ALR2d 566.

Rights in survival benefits under public pension or retirement plan as between designated beneficiary and heirs, legatees or personal representative of deceased employee, 5 ALR3d 644.

Validity of statutory classifications based on population, governmental employee salary or pension statutes, 96 ALR3d 538.

§ 9-3-601.
Short title.

This act is known and may be cited as “The Wyoming State Highway Patrol, Game and Fish Warden and Criminal Investigator Retirement Act”.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 157, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 31-11.1; W.S. 1977, §

31-3-101

; Laws 1983, ch. 154, § 1; 1984, ch. 47, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “This act,” referred to in this section, see §

9-3-602

(a)(xvii).

§ 9-3-602.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Accumulated contribution” means the sum of all the amounts deducted from the compensation of a member subsequent to the effective date of the Wyoming Retirement Act and credited to his individual account;

“Board” or “retirement board” means the retirement board of the Wyoming retirement system established by the Wyoming Retirement Act [article 4 of this chapter];

“Credited service” means service for which contributions were made and not refunded;

“Criminal investigator” means any full-time special agent employed by the division of criminal investigation of the attorney general’s office who is a sworn peace officer;

“Employee” means:

Any person who is employed by the Wyoming state highway patrol division as a sworn law enforcement officer;

Any person who is commissioned as a full time law enforcement officer of the Wyoming state game and fish department;

Any criminal investigator as defined in paragraph (iv) of this subsection; or

Any person designated and appointed as capitol police under W.S.

9-1-612

and qualified pursuant to W.S.

9-1-701

through

9-1-707

.

“Final actual salary” means the gross salary paid to the employee during the last full month of credited service;

Repealed by Laws 2001, ch. 32, § 2.

“Fund” or “retirement fund” means the Wyoming retirement account established in the Wyoming Retirement Act;

“Partial disability” means a medically determined physical or mental impairment which renders the employee unable to function as an employee and which is reasonably expected to last at least twelve (12) months;

“Interest” means interest compounded annually at such rate or rates as shall be determined by the board, not exceeding the average amount of interest actually earned per annum by the fund;

“Retirement program” means the Wyoming state highway patrol, game and fish warden and criminal investigator retirement program created by this article;

“Salary” for W.S.

9-3-604

and

9-3-605

means the cash remuneration paid, including contributions required by W.S.

9-3-604

, to an employee for his services;

“Total disability” means a medically determined physical or mental impairment which renders the employee totally unable to work in any occupation for which he is reasonably suited by training or experience and which is reasonably expected to last at least twelve (12) months;

“Service credit” means the credit earned by an employee for benefits and benefits payable under the retirement program. Service credit is earned on the basis of actual years of employment for an employer subject to this article under rules adopted by the board under W.S.

9-3-609

;

“Public law enforcement agency” means a public agency having police power, charged with enforcing state criminal statutes or municipal ordinances and employing law enforcement personnel qualified pursuant to W.S.

9-1-701

through

9-1-707

;

“Highest average salary” means the employee’s average annual salary for the highest paid three (3) continuous years of service;

“This act” means W.S.

9-3-601

through

9-3-620

;

“Duty connected disability” means a disability from an illness, injury or disease which results primarily from a specific act or occurrence determinable by a definite time and place, from a physical or mental trauma which arises from the nature and in the course of a person’s law enforcement employment;

“Eligible retirement plan” means as defined in W.S. 9-3-402(a)(xxvii);

“Rollover contribution” means as defined in W.S. 9-3-402(a)(xxviii).

“Member account” means:

For an employee who has six (6) or more years of service to his credit or an employee initially employed before July 1, 2018, the employee’s contributions paid from any source;

For an employee who has fewer than six (6) years of service to his credit and who is initially employed on or after July 1, 2018, only the employee’s contributions paid by a reduction in cash salary of the employee.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 157, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 31-11.2; Laws 1975, ch. 64, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

31-3-102

; Laws 1978, ch. 26, § 1; 1983, ch. 86, § 1; ch. 147, § 1; ch. 154, §§ 1-3; 1984, ch. 47, § 2; 1991, ch. 241, § 3; 1996, ch. 68, § 1; 2001, ch. 32, §§ 1, 2; ch. 115, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2007, ch. 47, § 1; 2010, ch. 58, § 1; 2015 ch. 10, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2018 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; 2019 ch. 186, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a)(viii), substituted “Wyoming retirement account” for “Wyoming retirement fund.”

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, added (a)(xviii).

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, added (a)(xix) and (a)(xx).

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (a)(x), substituted “Interest” for “Regular Interest” and inserted “or rates.”

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, added (a)(xxi).

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in the introductory language in (a), substituted "act" for "article, " and in (a)(xvii), deleted "'or this article'."

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

The Wyoming Retirement Act, referred to in subsection (a)(i), was effective on April 1, 1953. It is codified as §

9-3-401

et seq.

Regarding the reference in subparagraph (a)(v)(D) to W.S.

9-1-612

, subsection (c) of the latter, which provided that the director of the division of criminal investigation was to provide security services for state personnel and property, was repealed by Laws 2001, ch. 45, § 2, and all personnel, equipment and funding for capitol police was transferred to the Wyoming highway patrol by ch. 45, § 3.

Laws 2018, ch. 31, § 2, provides: “This act shall apply to the distribution
of benefits subject to this act made on and after the effective date
of this act.

“Nothing in
this act shall be construed to modify or impair existing contracts
or other obligations executed prior to the effective date of this
act.”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 9-3-603.
Administration.

There is created the retirement program which is for the benefit of the employees defined in W.S. 9-3-602(a)(v).

The administration and responsibility for the operation of the retirement program is under the direction and control of the board. All matters pertaining to the board are applicable to the retirement program created by this article.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 157, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 31-11.3; W.S. 1977, §

31-3-103

; Laws 1983, ch. 154, § 1; 1984, ch. 47, § 2; 1991, ch. 241, § 3.

§ 9-3-604.
Employee contributions.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, every employee covered by this article shall pay into the fund thirteen and fifty-four hundredths percent (13.54%) of his salary from September 1, 2013 through June 30, 2014, and thereafter fourteen and fifty-six hundredths percent (14.56%) of his salary. For the period from September 1, 2013 through June 30, 2014 forty-five hundredths percent (.45%), for the period from July 1, 2014 through June 30, 2016 ninety-six hundredths percent (.96%) and for the period from July 1, 2016 through June 30, 2017, fifty-one hundredths percent (.51%) salary contribution required by this subsection shall be paid by the employer on behalf of the member. To the extent the remaining amount is not paid by an employer on behalf of the member, this payment shall be deducted each pay period from employees’ salaries by the respective chief fiscal officers of the employers.

The contributions required by subsection (a) of this section shall be paid by the employer for employees covered under this article in order to be treated as employer contributions for the sole purpose of determining tax treatment under the United States internal revenue code.

The contributions under subsection (b) of this section shall be paid from the source of funds which is used in paying salary to the employee. The employer may pay these contributions by a reduction in cash salary of the employee or by an offset against a future salary increase, or by a combination of a reduction in salary and an offset against a future salary increase, provided:

No such salary reduction or offset, or combination thereof, shall exceed the percentage amount actually being deducted from an employee’s salary for contributions to the retirement program; and

Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, any employer may pay any amount of an employee’s share of retirement contributions without a salary reduction or offset, or combination thereof. For the period from July 1, 2012 through June 30, 2014, at least one and sixty-two hundredths percent (1.62%), for the period from July 1, 2014 through June 30, 2016 at least one and ninety-six hundredths percent (1.96%), for the period from July 1, 2016 through June 30, 2017 at least two and thirty hundredths percent (2.30%) and thereafter at least two and sixty-four hundredths (2.64%) of the employee’s share of retirement contributions shall be paid through a reduction in cash salary of the employee unless specified otherwise by legislative act.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 157, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 31-11.4; W.S. 1977, §

31-3-104

; Laws 1978, ch. 26, § 1; 1979, ch. 110, § 1; 1983, ch. 147, § 1; ch. 154, §§ 1, 3; 1984, ch. 47, § 2; 2012, ch. 23, § 1; 2013 ch. 203, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2014 ch. 19, § 1, effective March 4, 2014.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, in (a), substituted “twelve and sixty-four hundredths percent (12.64%)” for “eleven and two one-hundredths percent (11:02%)”, and added “To the extent not paid by an employer on behalf of the member”; deleted “From and after July 1, 1983” at the beginning of (b); and in (c), deleted “as of July 1, 1983” at the end of (c)(i), and in (c)(ii), added “Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph” and the second sentence.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added the proviso to (a) “until August 31, 2013, and thereafter thirteen and fifty-four hundredths percent (13.54%) of his salary. For the period from September 1, 2013 through August 31, 2016 forty-five hundredths percent (.45%) salary contribution required by this subsection shall be paid by the employer on behalf of the member.”
and “the remaining amount is”.

The 2014 amendment,

in (a), in the first sentence, deleted “twelve and sixty-four hundredths percent (12.64%) of his salary until August 31, 2013, and thereafter” following “fund” and inserted “from September 1, 2013 through June 30, 2014, and thereafter fourteen and fifty-six hundredths percent (14.56%) of his salary,” and in the second sentence, substituted “June 30, 2014” for “August 31, 2016” and inserted “for the period from July 1, 2014 through June 30, 2016 ninety-six hundredths percent (.96%) and for the period from July 1, 2016 through June 30, 2017, fifty-one hundredths percent (.51%)”; and in (c)(ii), in the second sentence, substituted “for the period from July 1, 2012 through June 30, 2014” for “On and after July 1, 2012” and inserted “for the period from July 1, 2014 through June 30, 2016 at least one and ninety-six hundredths percent (1.96%), for the period from July 1, 2016 through June 30, 2017 at least two and thirty hundredths percent (2.30%) and thereafter at least two and sixty-four hundredths (2.64%).”

Laws 2014, ch. 19, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 4, 2014.

§ 9-3-605.
Employer contributions.

Each employer subject to this article shall pay into the fund a contribution equal to twelve and ninety-six hundredths percent (12.96%) until June 30, 2014, and for the period from July 1, 2014 through June 30, 2015, thirteen and eighty-six hundredths percent (13.86%) and thereafter fourteen and eighty-eight hundredths percent (14.88%) of all salaries paid to its employees. These contributions, together with the employees’ contributions, shall be transferred and credited to the retirement program in a manner the board directs.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 157, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 31-11.5; W.S. 1977, § 31-3-105; Laws 1978, ch. 26, § 1; 1979, ch. 110, § 1; 1981, ch. 17, § 1; 1983, ch. 154, § 1; 1984, ch. 47, § 2; 2012, ch. 23, § 1; 2013 ch. 203, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2014 ch. 19, § 1, effective March 4, 2014.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “twelve and ninety-six hundredths percent (12.96%) of all salaries paid to its employees” for “eleven and thirty-three one-hundredths percent (11.33%) of all salaries paid to its employees and may pay into the fund any amount of the employees' share of retirement contributions,” and made a stylistic change.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added “until August 31, 2014, and thereafter thirteen and eighty-six hundredths percent (13.86%)”.

The 2014 amendment,

in the first sentence, substituted “June 30, 2014, and for the period from July 1, 2014 through June 30, 2015” for “August 31, 2014, and thereafter,” and inserted “and thereafter fourteen and eighty-eight hundredths percent (14.88%).”

Laws 2014, ch. 19, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 4, 2014.

Appropriations. —

Laws 2012, ch. 23, § 2, provides:

“(a) There is appropriatedthe following for the period specified in subsection (b) of this section:

“(i) From the generalfund to the office of the attorney general one hundred twenty-onethousand dollars ($121,000.00);

“(ii) From the game andfish fund to the game and fish commission one hundred ninety-threethousand dollars ($193,000.00);

“(iii) From the highwayfund to the department of transportation five hundred thirty-fivethousand dollars ($535,000.00).

“(b) The appropriationsunder subsection (a) of this section shall only be expended for thepurpose of providing each state agency's increased employer contributionrequired by W.S.

9-3-605

as amended by this act, for the 2013-2014 fiscal biennium.

“(c) No part of theseappropriations shall be used to provide the increased employee contributionrequired by this act. Notwithstanding any other provision of law,the appropriations under this section shall not be transferred orexpended for any purpose other than as specified in this section.Any unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from the appropriationsunder this section shall revert as provided by law on June 30, 2014.”

§ 9-3-606.
Transfer of funds to retirement program.

All employee and matching contributions made to the Wyoming retirement system or other retirement system on behalf of an employee now covered under the retirement program and the accrued interest thereon shall be transferred to the retirement program.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 157, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 31-11.6; W.S. 1977, § 31-3-106; Laws 1983, ch. 154, § 1; 1984, ch. 47, § 2.

§ 9-3-607.
Age of retirement.

Any employee with six (6) or more years of service to his credit is eligible to receive a retirement allowance under this article when he attains age fifty (50).

Effective July 1, 1998, any employee retiring after July 1, 1998, with twenty-five (25) or more years of service may elect to retire and receive a benefit upon attaining age fifty (50) as described in W.S.

9-3-610

.

Repealed by Laws 1993, ch. 120, §§ 1, 2.

Any employee in service who has attained age sixty-five (65), shall be retired not later than the last day of the calendar month in which his 65th birthday occurs.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 157, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 31-11.7; W.S. 1977, § 31-3-107; Laws 1983, ch. 154, § 1; 1984, ch. 47, § 2; 1985, ch. 33, § 1; 1993, ch. 120, §§ 1, 2; 1998, ch. 78, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

“Bona fide employee benefit plan” exception to general prohibition of age discrimination in employment (29 USC § 623(f)(2)), 70 ALR Fed 110.

§ 9-3-608.
Retirement allowance.

Any employee who has left the service, and who has not withdrawn his accumulated contributions, is eligible to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the terms of this article at the age specified in W.S.

9-3-607

.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 157, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 31-11.8; W.S. 1977, § 31-3-108; Laws 1983, ch. 154, § 1; 1984, ch. 47, § 2.

§ 9-3-609.
Determination of years of service by board; credit for time spent in military service.

The board shall determine the total years of service creditable to each employee in determining eligibility for retirement under this article. It may require employees to file detailed statements of all service as a state employee and to give other necessary information as a condition to the receipt of benefits.

The board shall establish in appropriate rules and regulations how much service in any year is the equivalent of one (1) year of service, but in no case shall it allow credit for more than one (1) year of service for all service rendered within one (1) calendar year.

Credit shall be allowed for any period of time after commencement of participation in the retirement program which an employee spends in active military or other emergency service of the United States in accordance with rules adopted by the retirement board, pursuant to the Uniformed Services Employment and Reemployment Rights Act, 38 U.S.C. 4301 et seq.

Effective May 27, 1983, if an employee receives a partial or total disability benefit under this article and that employee subsequently returns to service as a highway patrol, criminal investigator, capitol police or game and fish employee, service credit shall be allowed for the period during which the employee received those benefits.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 157, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 31-11.9; W.S. 1977, § 31-3-109; Laws 1983, ch. 86, § 1; ch. 154, § 1; 1984, ch. 47, § 2; 2003, ch. 178, § 1; 2010, ch. 58, § 1.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (c), substituted “spends in active military” for “spends in military,” substituted “in accordance with rules adopted” for “approved,” and substituted “pursuant to the Uniformed Services Employment and Reemployment Rights Act, 38 U.S.C. 4301 et seq” for “if the employee does not withdraw his accumulated contributions and makes payments equal to the deductions which would have been made during his absence within such time as the board prescribes after his return to service. In the absence of payments instead of deductions, the period of time shall be credited for the purpose of eligibility for retirement allowances under W.S.

9-3-607

and

9-3-608

, but not for the purpose of the computation of those allowances under W.S.

9-3-610

.”

§ 9-3-610.
Amount of benefit.

The service retirement allowance payable to an employee under this article at age fifty (50) shall be equal to two and one-half percent (2.5%) of the employee’s highest average salary for each year of credited service in the program, provided the retirement allowance does not exceed seventy-five percent (75%) of the highest average salary.

Subject to subsection (c) of this section, effective July 1, 1991, the amount of allowance being paid under subsection (a) of this section shall be increased as follows:

For persons who retired prior to July 1, 1978, eleven dollars ($11.00) per month for each year of service in Wyoming;

For persons who retired on or after July 1, 1978 but prior to July 1, 1980, six dollars ($6.00) per month for each year of service in Wyoming;

For persons who retired on or after July 1, 1980 but prior to July 1, 1985, three dollars ($3.00) per month for each year of service in Wyoming;

For persons who retired on or after July 1, 1985 but prior to July 1, 1987, one dollar ($1.00) per month for each year of service in Wyoming.

The increases specified in subsection (b) of this section apply only if the legislature appropriates the necessary funds and only for persons with full-time service who submit to the board an application for the increase accompanied by an affidavit verifying the applicant’s service and retirement.

Repealed by Laws 2012, ch. 107, § 3.

In addition to subsections (a), (b) and (d) of this section, the service retirement allowance payable under this article for persons retired prior to April 1, 1996, shall be increased by five dollars ($5.00) per month for each year of service in Wyoming.

Benefits and allowances shall not be payable under this article to the extent that they exceed the limitations imposed by section 415(b) of the Internal Revenue Code.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 157, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 31-11.10; W.S. 1977, § 31-3-110; Laws 1983, ch. 154, § 1; 1984, ch. 47, § 2; 1985, ch. 220, § 1; 1989, ch. 146, § 1; 1991, ch. 67, § 1; 1993, ch. 120, § 1; 1994, ch. 55, § 1; 1996, ch. 38, § 1; 1997, ch. 31, § 2; ch. 118, § 1; 1998, ch. 78, § 1; 1999, ch. 77, § 1; 2001, ch. 32, § 1; 2004, ch. 55, § 1; 2010, ch. 58, § 1; 2012, ch. 107, § 3.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, rewrote (d)(ii) and (iii), modifying benefit adjustments for cost-of-living increases.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, added (f).

The 2012 amendment,

repealed former (d), which read: “Effective July 1, 2001 and on each July 1 thereafter, any service retirement allowance, survivor benefit or disability benefit received by eligible individuals under this act shall be adjusted as follows: (i) Before each July 1, the board shall determine the percentage increase in the cost of living for the preceding calendar year. The percentage increase in the cost of living for a calendar year is equal to the annual percentage increase in the cost of living as of the immediately following January 1 as shown by the Wyoming cost-of-living index as determined by the division of economic analysis of the department of administration and information; (ii) Subject to the limitation imposed under paragraph (vi) of this subsection, the benefits existing on each July 1 for each eligible individual may be increased by an amount not to exceed the greater of the percentage increase in the cost of living as determined by the board under paragraph (i) of this subsection or a percentage adjustment to a level the actuary of the Wyoming retirement system determines to be actuarially sound pursuant to paragraph (v) of this subsection; (iii) The amount of any percentage increase in the cost of living which exceeds the percentage adjustment under paragraph (ii) of this subsection shall to the extent determined actuarially sound by the system's actuary, be accumulated and added to the percentage increases in the cost of living for future years; (iv) Individuals who have been receiving applicable benefits for at least two (2) years, either alone or in combination with an eligible employee if the individual is a survivor, are eligible for the benefits under this subsection; (v) An increase in benefits under this subsection is effective only upon a determination by the actuary of the Wyoming retirement system that the increase is actuarially sound. The actuary shall report its annual determination under this paragraph to the governor and the joint appropriations interim committee; and (vi) The total benefit adjustment under this subsection shall not exceed two and one-fourth percent (21/4%) in any one (1) year.”

Laws 2012, ch. 107, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 23, 2012.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see §

9-3-602

(xvii).

§ 9-3-611.
Eligibility and amount of disability allowance.

Any employee who suffers a partial or total disability resulting from an individual and specific act, the type of which would normally occur only while employed as an employee, is eligible for a duty-connected disability allowance. If the specific act involves a traumatic event which directly causes an immediate cardiovascular condition resulting in partial or total disability, the employee is eligible for a partial or total duty-connected disability allowance.

Any employee with ten (10) years of credited service who suffers a partial or total disability and who is not eligible for a duty-connected disability allowance is eligible for an ordinary partial or total disability allowance.

The determination of disability and its cause shall be made by the board after receiving the recommendation of its medical committee.

Disability allowances shall be fifty percent (50%) of highest average salary for nonduty connected total or partial disability. Disability allowances shall be sixty-two and one-half percent (62.5%) of highest average salary for duty-connected total or partial disability.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 86, § 2; ch. 154, §§ 1, 2; 1984, ch. 47, § 2; 2001, ch. 32, § 1; 2003, ch. 178, § 1; 2004, ch. 65, § 1; 2005, ch. 153, § 1; 2007, ch. 47, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, rewrote (d), modifying disability allowances under the state highway patrol, game and fish warden and criminal investigator retirement.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (d), raised the allowance for duty-connected disability from 50% to 62.5%.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, substituted “nonduty connected” for “ordinary” in (d).

Prospective application. —

Section 3, ch. 86, Laws 1983, effective May 27, 1983, reads: “This act shall not reduce benefits for persons retired for disability prior to the effective date unless the retired person returns to state employment at a subsequent date.”

§ 9-3-612.
Payment of disability allowance.

Disability allowance payments shall be made to an employee for each month beginning with the month in which he becomes eligible to receive such allowance and ending with the month in which he ceases to be eligible or dies.

Any employee receiving a nonduty-connected disability allowance who has not reached age fifty (50) shall report to the board annually, in a form the board prescribes, his total earnings for the preceding calendar year from any gainful employment for wages and any worker’s compensation benefits. One-half (1/2) of the excess of such earnings or benefits, or both, over the base pay of the rank held at the time of disability shall be deducted, in a manner the board determines, from that employee’s disability allowance beginning ninety (90) days following the day the report is due. If any member received a disability allowance for less than twelve (12) months in the calendar year for which earnings are reported, the deduction, if any, shall be determined on a pro rata basis.

Any member receiving a partial disability allowance whose disability is found to no longer exist, shall continue to receive the disability allowance if he is actively seeking employment as an employee, as defined by W.S. 9-3-602(a)(v), and has not been offered an employee position. In order to qualify under this subsection, the employee shall report to the board annually, in a form the board prescribes. The board shall establish by rule, requirements for meeting the provisions of this subsection. If the member refuses or fails to meet the requirements of this subsection or applicable rules of the board, his disability allowance shall be discontinued.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 157, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 31-11.12; Laws 1975, ch. 64, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 31-3-112; Laws 1983, ch. 86, § 2; ch. 154, §§ 1, 2; 1984, ch. 47, § 2; 1998, ch. 78, § 1; 2003, ch. 178, § 1; 2005, ch. 152, § 1.

The 2005 amendment

, in (b), inserted “nonduty-connected” in the first sentence.

Laws 2005, ch. 152, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 26, 2005.

§ 9-3-613.
Payment on death; duty related.

If a member of the retirement program dies as a result of any activity related to official duties as an employee prior to retirement under this article, a monthly death benefit equal to fifty percent (50%) of the member’s final actual salary at time of death shall be paid to the surviving spouse. In addition, an amount equal to five percent (5%) of the final actual salary shall be paid as a benefit for each unmarried child under the age of eighteen (18) years, provided the total death benefit paid to the surviving spouse and children in accordance with this section shall not exceed the employee’s final actual salary.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 157, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 31-11.13; Laws 1975, ch. 64, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 31-3-113; Laws 1983, ch. 154, § 1; 1984, ch. 47, § 2; 1987, ch. 35, § 1.

§ 9-3-614.
Payment on death; not duty-related death of retired member.

If a member dies prior to retirement and his death is not related to his official duties as an employee, a monthly nonduty death benefit shall be paid to the surviving spouse, equal to two percent (2%) of the member’s final actual salary at time of death for each year of credited service. The maximum nonduty death benefit payable to the spouse shall not exceed fifty percent (50%) of the member’s final actual salary. In addition, an amount equal to five percent (5%) of the final actual salary shall be paid as a benefit for each unmarried child under the age of eighteen (18) years. The total nonduty death benefit paid to the surviving spouse and children in accordance with this subsection shall not exceed sixty percent (60%) of the employee’s final actual salary.

If a retired member of the retirement program dies, the spouse of the deceased member shall receive a benefit equal to fifty percent (50%) of the retirement allowance paid in accordance with W.S.

9-3-607

through

9-3-614

. In determining the benefit to be paid to the spouse, no reduction due to social security shall be taken into account. In addition, an amount equal to five percent (5%) of the final actual salary shall be paid as a benefit for each unmarried child under the age of eighteen (18) years. The total benefit paid to the surviving spouse and children on the death of the retired member in accordance with this subsection shall not exceed sixty percent (60%) of the employee’s final actual salary.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 157, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 31-11.14; Laws 1975, ch. 64, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 31-3-114; Laws 1983, ch. 154, § 1; 1984, ch. 47, § 2; 1987, ch. 35, § 1.

§ 9-3-615.
Election of coverage under Wyoming Retirement Act.

Subject to uniform rules and regulations the retirement board prescribes, instead of the service allowance provided in this article and instead of the benefit specified in W.S. 9-3-614(b), a member of the retirement program may elect one (1) of the following forms of service retirement benefits which shall be the actuarial equivalent of the benefit to which he would otherwise be entitled:

A one hundred percent (100%) joint and survivor benefit which provides reduced monthly service retirement benefit payments during the retired member’s life and upon his death after retirement continues payments in the same reduced amount to a designated beneficiary during the life of the beneficiary;

A benefit which provides reduced monthly service retirement payments with provision for the continuance of payments for ten (10) years certain and life thereafter. If the retired member dies within ten (10) years after retirement, the remaining guaranteed payments shall be made to his designated beneficiary. This beneficiary may be changed at any time by written notification to the board as provided in subsection (b) of this section;

The largest possible benefit for life with no lump sum refund or benefit for anyone else upon the retired member’s death;

Any other modified monthly service retirement benefit, including any other modified joint and survivor monthly service retirement benefit, actuarially determined, which the board approves.

An election of an optional benefit shall be in writing and filed with the system prior to the first benefit payment. The election is final and not subject to change unless a designated beneficiary dies prior to the first benefit payment, in which case the election is void, the member may designate a new beneficiary and may select a different option. As provided in paragraph (a)(iii) of this section, upon written notice to the board, a member may change a beneficiary at any time during the ten (10) year period.

The retirement benefits payable under optional forms available under this section shall be the actuarial equivalent amount of the normal benefit form under W.S.

9-3-610

.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 157, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 31-11.15; W.S. 1977, § 31-3-115; Laws 1983, ch. 154, § 1; 1984, ch. 47, § 2; 1998, ch. 78, § 1.

§ 9-3-616.
Applicability of portions of Wyoming Retirement Act.

Requirements for eligibility for disability retirement under this article, either related or not related to official duties as an employee, shall be in accordance with the disability provisions outlined in the Wyoming Retirement Act [article 4 of this chapter].

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 157, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 31-11.16; W.S. 1977, § 31-3-116; Laws 1983, ch. 154, § 1; 1984, ch. 47, § 2.